Colorado statutes. TITLE 44 Revenue - Regulation of Activities
PART 9
UNLAWFUL ACTS - ENFORCEMENT

44-3-901. Unlawful acts - exceptions - definitions.

Except as provided in section 18-13-122, it is unlawful for any person:

To sell, serve, give away, dispose of, exchange, or deliver, or permit the sale, serving, giving, or procuring of, any alcohol beverage to a visibly intoxicated person or to a known habitual drunkard;

To sell, serve, give away, dispose of, exchange, or deliver or permit the sale, serving, giving, or procuring of any alcohol beverage to or for any person under the age of twenty-one years.

If a person is convicted of an offense pursuant to subsection (1)(b)(I) of this section for serving, giving away, disposing of, exchanging, or delivering or permitting the serving, giving, or procuring of any alcohol beverage to a person under the age of twenty-one years, the court shall consider the following in mitigation:

After consuming the alcohol, the underage person was in need of medical assistance as a result of consuming alcohol; and

Within six hours after the underage person consumed the alcohol, the defendant contacted the police or emergency medical personnel to report that the underage person was in need of medical assistance as a result of consuming alcohol.

At any time on such premises other than the alcohol beverages purchased from the establishment; or

In any public room on the licensed premises during hours during which the sale of the alcohol beverage is prohibited under this article 3.

To obtain or attempt to obtain any alcohol beverage by misrepresentation of age or by any other method in any place where alcohol beverages are sold when a person is under twenty-one years of age;

To possess alcohol beverages in any store, in any public place, including public streets, alleys, roads, or highways, or upon property owned by the state of Colorado or any subdivision thereof, or inside vehicles while upon the public streets, alleys, roads, or highways when a person is under twenty-one years of age;

To knowingly, or under conditions that an average parent or guardian should have knowledge of, suffer or permit any person under twenty-one years of age, of whom such person may be a parent or guardian, to violate the provisions of subsection (1)(c) or (1)(d) of this section;

To buy any vinous or spirituous liquor from any person not licensed to sell at retail as provided by this article 3 except as otherwise provided in this article 3;

To sell at retail any malt, vinous, or spirituous liquors in sealed containers without holding a retail liquor store or liquor-licensed drugstore license, except as permitted by section 44-3-107 (2) or 44-3-301 (6)(b) or any other provision of this article 3, or to sell at retail any fermented malt beverages in sealed containers without holding a fermented malt beverage retailer's license under sections 44-4-104 (1)(c) and 44-4-107 (1)(a);

To manufacture, sell, or possess for sale any alcohol beverage unless licensed to do so as provided by this article 3 or article 4 or 5 of this title 44 and unless all licenses required are in full force and effect;

To consume any alcohol beverages:

Notwithstanding subsection (1)(i)(I) of this section, a person who is at least twenty-one years of age may consume alcohol beverages while the person is a passenger aboard a luxury limousine or a charter bus, as those terms are defined in section 40-10.1-301. Nothing in this subsection (1)(i)(II) authorizes an owner or operator of a luxury limousine or charter bus to sell or distribute alcohol beverages without obtaining a public transportation system license pursuant to section 44-3-421.

Notwithstanding subsection (1)(i)(I) of this section, it shall not be unlawful for adult patrons of a retail liquor store or liquor-licensed drugstore licensee to consume malt, vinous, or spirituous liquors on the licensed premises when the consumption is conducted within the limitations of the licensee's license and is part of a tasting if authorization for the tasting has been granted pursuant to section 44-3-301.

Notwithstanding subsection (1)(i)(I) of this section, it is not unlawful for adult patrons of an art gallery permittee to consume alcohol beverages on the premises when the consumption is conducted within the limitations of a valid permit granted pursuant to section 44-3-424.

Notwithstanding subsection (1)(i)(I) of this section, it is not unlawful for adult patrons of the Colorado state fair to consume malt, vinous, or spirituous liquor upon unlicensed areas within the designated fairgrounds of the Colorado state fair authority or at a licensed premises on the fairgrounds when not purchased at the licensed premises, but this subsection (1)(i)(V) does not authorize a patron to remove an alcohol beverage from the fairgrounds.

Notwithstanding subsection (1)(i)(I) of this section, it is not unlawful for adult patrons of a licensed premises that is attached to a common consumption area to consume alcohol beverages upon unlicensed areas within a common consumption area, but this subsection (1)(i)(VI) does not authorize a patron to remove an alcohol beverage from the common consumption area.

Notwithstanding subsection (1)(i)(I) of this section, it is not unlawful for a person who is at least twenty-one years of age to consume any alcohol beverages in any public place, other than a public right of way, where consumption of alcohol beverages has been specifically authorized by ordinance, resolution, or rule adopted by a municipality, city and county, or county or, for purposes of state parks, state wildlife areas, or other properties open to recreation that are under the supervision of the parks and wildlife commission created in article 9 of title 33, by the parks and wildlife commission.

Notwithstanding subsection (1)(i)(I) of this section and when and where consumption is specifically authorized by an ordinance adopted by the city and county of Denver, it is not unlawful for adult patrons of the national western center to consume malt, vinous, or spirituous liquors in unlicensed areas of the national western center or at a licensed premises in the national western center when not purchased at the licensed premises. This subsection (1)(i)(VIII) does not authorize a patron to remove an alcohol beverage from the national western center.

(A) In any public place except on any licensed premises permitted under this article 3 or article 4 of this title 44 to sell any alcohol beverages by the drink for consumption on the licensed premises;

(B) Upon any premises licensed to sell alcohol beverages for consumption on the licensed premises, the sale of which is not authorized by the state licensing authority;

To regularly provide premises, or any portion thereof together with soft drinks or other mix, ice, glasses, or containers at a direct or indirect cost or charge to any person who brings alcohol beverages upon the premises for the purpose of consuming the beverages on the premises during the hours in which the sale of such beverages is prohibited or to consume such beverages upon premises operated in the manner described in this subsection (1)(j);

To possess any package, parcel, or container on which the excise tax has not been paid;

With knowledge, to permit or fail to prevent the use of his or her identification, including a driver's license, by a person who is under twenty-one years of age, for the unlawful purchase of any alcohol beverage;

Who is a common carrier regulated under article 10.1 of title 40, or is an agent or employee of such common carrier, to deliver alcohol beverages for any person who has not been issued a license or permit pursuant to this article 3;

To remove an alcohol beverage from a licensed premises where the liquor license for the licensed premises allows only on-premises consumption of alcohol beverages, except as permitted under subsection (1)(i)(VI) of this section or section 44-3-107 (2).

An underage person is immune from arrest and prosecution under subsection (1)(c) or (1)(d) of this section if he or she establishes the following:

The underage person called 911 and reported that another underage person was in need of medical assistance due to alcohol consumption;

The underage person who called 911 provided his or her name to the 911 operator;

The underage person was the first person to make the 911 report; and

The underage person who made the 911 call remained on the scene with the underage person in need of medical assistance until assistance arrived and cooperated with medical assistance or law enforcement personnel on the scene.

The immunity described in subsection (2)(a) of this section also extends to the underage person who was in need of medical assistance due to alcohol consumption if the conditions of subsection (2)(a) of this section are satisfied.

It is unlawful for any person licensed as a manufacturer, limited winery, brew pub, or distillery pub pursuant to this article 3 to manufacture alcohol beverages in any location other than the permanent location specifically designated in the license for manufacturing, except as allowed pursuant to section 44-3-402 (3), 44-3-403 (2)(a), 44-3-417 (1)(b), or 44-3-422 (1)(b).

It is unlawful for any person to import or sell any imported alcohol beverage in this state unless that person is the primary source of supply in the United States for the brand of such liquor to be imported into or sold within this state and unless that person holds a valid importer's license issued under the provisions of this article 3.

If it is determined by the state licensing authority, in its discretion, as not constituting unfair competition or unfair practice, any importer may be authorized by the state licensing authority to import and sell under and subject to the provisions of the importer's license any brand of alcohol beverage for which he or she is not the primary source of supply in the United States if the licensee is the sole source of supply of that brand of alcohol beverage in the state of Colorado and authorization is determined by the state licensing authority as not constituting a violation of section 44-3-308.

Any such manufacturer or importer shall file with the state licensing authority notice of intent to import one or more specified brands of the alcohol beverage, together with a statement that the manufacturer or importer is the primary source of supply in the United States for the brand, unless exempted pursuant to subsection (4)(b) of this section, in which case, the manufacturer or importer shall also file a statement that the manufacturer or importer is the sole source of supply of that brand of beverage in the state of Colorado. Upon the request of the state licensing authority, the manufacturer or importer shall file a copy of the manufacturer's federal brand label approval form as required by the federal bureau of alcohol, tobacco, firearms, and explosives or any of its successor agencies. Thereafter, the licensee shall file with the state licensing authority a copy of each sales invoice with a monthly sales report as required by section 44-3-503 (4) and (6).

As used in this subsection (4), the term "primary source of supply in the United States" means the manufacturer, the producer, the owner of such alcohol beverage at the time it becomes a marketable product, the bottler in the United States, or the exclusive agent within the United States, or any of the states, of any such manufacturer, producer, owner, or bottler outside the United States. To be the "primary source of supply in the United States", the said manufacturer or importer must be the first source, such as the manufacturer or the source closest to the manufacturer, in the channel of commerce from which the product can be secured by Colorado alcohol beverage wholesalers.

It is unlawful for any person licensed as an importer of alcohol beverages pursuant to this article 3 to deliver any such alcohol beverages to any person not in possession of a valid wholesaler's license.

It is unlawful for any person licensed to sell at wholesale pursuant to this article 3:

To peddle malt, vinous, or spirituous liquor at wholesale or by means of a truck or other vehicle if the sale is consummated and delivery made concurrently, but nothing in this subsection (5)(a) shall prevent delivery from a truck or other vehicle of orders previously taken;

To deliver malt liquors to any retail licensee located outside the geographic territory designated on the license application filed with the state licensing authority if the person holds a wholesaler's beer license;

To purchase or receive any alcohol beverage from any person not licensed pursuant to this article 3 or article 4 of this title 44, unless otherwise provided in this article 3;

To sell or serve any alcohol beverage to consumers for consumption on or off the licensed premises during any hours retailers are prohibited from selling or serving such liquors pursuant to subsection (6) of this section.

It is unlawful for any person licensed to sell at retail pursuant to this article 3 or article 4 of this title 44:

To sell an alcohol beverage to any person under the age of twenty-one years, to a habitual drunkard, or to a visibly intoxicated person. If a person who, in fact, is not twenty-one years of age exhibits a fraudulent proof of age, any action relying on such fraudulent proof of age shall not constitute grounds for the revocation or suspension of any license issued under this article 3 or article 4 of this title 44.

If a licensee or a licensee's employee has reasonable cause to believe that a person is under twenty-one years of age and is exhibiting fraudulent proof of age in an attempt to obtain any alcohol beverage, the licensee or employee shall be authorized to confiscate the fraudulent proof of age, if possible, and shall, within seventy-two hours after the confiscation, turn it over to a state or local law enforcement agency. The failure to confiscate such fraudulent proof of age or to turn it over to a state or local law enforcement agency within seventy-two hours after the confiscation shall not constitute a criminal offense, notwithstanding section 44-3-904 (1)(a).

If a licensee or a licensee's employee believes that a person is under twenty-one years of age and is exhibiting fraudulent proof of age in an attempt to obtain any alcohol beverage, the licensee or the licensee's employee or any peace or police officer, acting in good faith and upon probable cause based upon reasonable grounds therefor, may detain and question the person in a reasonable manner for the purpose of ascertaining whether the person is guilty of any unlawful act under this section. Questioning of a person by a licensee or a licensee's employee or a peace or police officer does not render the licensee, the licensee's employee, or a peace or police officer civilly or criminally liable for slander, false arrest, false imprisonment, malicious prosecution, or unlawful detention.

Each licensee shall display a printed card that contains notice of the provisions of this subsection (6)(a).

Any licensee or licensee's employee acting in good faith in accordance with the provisions of subsection (6)(a)(II) of this section shall be immune from any liability, civil or criminal; except that a licensee or employee acting willfully or wantonly shall not be immune from liability pursuant to subsection (6)(a)(II) of this section.

To sell, serve, or distribute any malt, vinous, or spirituous liquors at any time other than the following:

For consumption on the premises on any day of the week, except between the hours of 2 a.m. and 7 a.m.;

In sealed containers, beginning at 8 a.m. until 12 midnight each day; except that no malt, vinous, or spirituous liquors shall be sold, served, or distributed in a sealed container on Christmas day;

To sell fermented malt beverages:

To any person under the age of twenty-one years, except as provided in section 18-13-122;

To any person between the hours of 12 midnight and 8 a.m.; or

In a sealed container on Christmas day;

To offer for sale or solicit any order for vinous or spirituous liquors in person at retail except within the licensed premises;

Except as provided in section 44-3-107 (2), to have in possession or upon the licensed premises any alcohol beverage, the sale of which is not permitted by said license;

To buy any alcohol beverages from any person not licensed to sell at wholesale as provided by this article 3 except as otherwise provided in this article 3;

To sell at retail alcohol beverages except in the permanent location specifically designated in the license for such sale;

To fail to display at all times in a prominent place a printed card with a minimum height of fourteen inches and a width of eleven inches with each letter to be a minimum of one-half inch in height, which shall read as follows:

To sell malt, vinous, or spirituous liquors or fermented malt beverages in a place where the alcohol beverages are to be consumed, unless the place is a hotel, restaurant, tavern, lodging and entertainment facility, racetrack, club, retail gaming tavern, or arts licensed premises or unless the place is a dining, club, or parlor car; plane; bus; or other conveyance or facility of a public transportation system.

Notwithstanding subsection (6)(i)(I) of this section, it shall not be unlawful for a retail liquor store or liquor-licensed drugstore licensee to allow tastings to be conducted on his or her licensed premises if authorization for the tastings has been granted pursuant to section 44-3-301.

To display or cause to be displayed, on the licensed premises, any exterior sign advertising any particular brand of malt liquors or fermented malt beverages, unless the particular brand so designated in the sign is dispensed on draft or in sealed containers within the licensed premises wherein the sign is displayed;

Except as provided in subsections (6)(k)(II), (6)(k)(IV), and (6)(k)(V) of this section, to have on the licensed premises, if licensed as a retail liquor store, liquor-licensed drugstore, or fermented malt beverage retailer, any container that shows evidence of having once been opened or that contains a volume of liquor less than that specified on the label of the container;

A person holding a retail liquor store or liquor-licensed drugstore license under this article 3 may have upon the licensed premises malt, vinous, or spirituous liquors in open containers when the open containers were brought on the licensed premises by and remain solely in the possession of the sales personnel of a person licensed to sell at wholesale pursuant to this article 3 for the purpose of sampling malt, vinous, or spirituous liquors by the retail liquor store or liquor-licensed drugstore licensee only.

A person holding a fermented malt beverage retailer's license under section 44-4-107 (1)(a) may have upon the licensed premises fermented malt beverages in open containers when the open containers were brought onto the licensed premises by and remain solely in the possession of the sales personnel of a person licensed to sell at wholesale pursuant to article 4 of this title 44 for the purpose of sampling fermented malt beverages by the fermented malt beverage retailer licensee only.

Nothing in this subsection (6)(k) applies to any liquor-licensed drugstore where the contents, or a portion of the contents, have been used in compounding prescriptions.

It is not unlawful for a retail liquor store or liquor-licensed drugstore licensee to allow tastings to be conducted on the licensed premises if authorization for the tastings has been granted pursuant to section 44-3-301.

A person holding a retail liquor store or liquor-licensed drugstore license under this article 3 or a fermented malt beverage retailer's license under section 44-4-107 (1)(a) may have upon the licensed premises an open container of an alcohol beverage product that the licensee discovers to be damaged or defective so long as the licensee marks the product as damaged or for return and stores the open container outside the sales area of the licensed premises until the licensee is able to return the product to the wholesaler from whom the product was purchased.

To employ or permit, if the person is licensed to sell alcohol beverages for on-premises consumption or is the agent or manager of said licensee, any employee, waiter, waitress, entertainer, host, hostess, or agent of said licensee to solicit from patrons in any manner, for himself or herself or for any other employee, the purchase of any food, beverage, or any other thing of value;

To require a wholesaler to make delivery to any premises other than the specific hotel and restaurant premises where the alcohol beverage is to be sold and consumed if the person is a hotel and restaurant licensee or the manager of a hotel and restaurant license requires the delivery;

To authorize or permit any gambling, or the use of any gambling machine or device, except as provided by the "Bingo and Raffles Law", part 6 of article 21 of title 24. This subsection (6)(n) does not apply to those activities, equipment, and devices authorized and legally operated pursuant to articles 30 and 32 of this title 44.

A person who violates any provision of this subsection (6)(n) is guilty of a class 5 felony and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-401.

To authorize or permit toughperson fighting as defined in section 12-110-104;

To permit a person under eighteen years of age to sell, dispense, or participate in the sale or dispensing of any alcohol beverage; or
(p) (I) (A) To permit a person under eighteen years of age to sell, dispense, or participate in the sale or dispensing of any alcohol beverage; or

Except as provided in subsection (6)(p)(II) of this section, to employ a person who is at least eighteen years of age but under twenty-one years of age to sell or dispense malt, vinous, or spirituous liquors unless the employee is supervised by another person who is on the licensed premises and is at least twenty-one years of age; except that this subsection (6)(p)(I)(B) does not apply to a retail liquor store licensed under section 44-3-409 or a liquor-licensed drugstore licensed under section 44-3-410;

If licensed as a tavern under section 44-3-414 that does not regularly serve meals or a lodging and entertainment facility under section 44-3-428 that does not regularly serve meals, to permit an employee who is under twenty-one years of age to sell malt, vinous, or spirituous liquors; or

If licensed as a retail liquor store under section 44-3-409, a liquor-licensed drugstore under section 44-3-410, or a fermented malt beverage retailer under section 44-4-107 (1)(a), to permit an employee who is under twenty-one years of age to deliver malt, vinous, or spirituous liquors or fermented malt beverages offered for sale on, or sold and removed from, the licensed premises of the retail liquor store, liquor-licensed drugstore, or fermented malt beverage retailer.

It is unlawful for any importer, manufacturer, or brewer to sell or to bring into this state for purposes of sale any malt liquor without causing the same to be unloaded and placed in the physical possession of a licensed wholesaler at the wholesaler's licensed premises in this state and to be inventoried for purposes of tax collection prior to delivery to a retailer or consumer.

It is unlawful for any person licensed pursuant to this article 3 or article 4 of this title 44 to give away fermented malt beverages for the purpose of influencing the sale of any particular kind, make, or brand of any malt beverage and to furnish or supply any commodity or article at less than its market price for said purpose, except advertising material and signs.

Notwithstanding subsection (8)(a) of this section, it shall not be unlawful for a retail liquor store or liquor-licensed drugstore licensee to allow tastings to be conducted on his or her licensed premises if authorization for the tastings has been granted pursuant to section 44-3-301.

Repealed.

Except as provided in subsection (10)(c) of this section, it is unlawful for a person who is licensed to sell alcohol beverages for consumption on the licensed premises to knowingly permit the removal of an alcohol beverage from the licensed premises.
(10) (a) (I) Except as provided in subsection (10)(c) of this section, it is unlawful for a person who is licensed to sell alcohol beverages for consumption on the licensed premises to knowingly permit the removal of an alcohol beverage from the licensed premises.

Except as provided in subsection (10)(a)(II)(C) of this section, the licensee shall not be charged with permitting the removal of an alcohol beverage from the licensed premises when the licensee has posted a sign at least ten inches wide and six inches high by each exit used by the public that contains the following notice in type that is at least one-half inch in height:

A person licensed pursuant to section 44-3-416 must post a sign with the specified notice and in the minimum type size required by subsection (10)(a)(II)(A) of this section that is at least twelve inches wide and eighteen inches high.

Regardless of whether a licensee posts a sign as specified in subsection (10)(a)(II) of this section, the licensee may be charged with knowingly permitting the removal of an alcohol beverage from the licensed premises if the licensee shows reckless disregard for the prohibition against alcohol beverage removal from the licensed premises, which may include permitting the removal of an alcohol beverage from the licensed premises three times within a twelve-month period, regardless of whether the three incidents occur on the same day or separate days. A licensee may be charged with knowingly permitting the removal of an alcohol beverage from the licensed premises upon the third occurrence of alcohol beverage removal from the licensed premises.

In addition to posting a sign as described in subsection (10)(a)(II) of this section, a licensee may also station personnel at each exit used by the public in order to prevent the removal of an alcohol beverage from the licensed premises.

This subsection (10) applies to persons licensed or permitted to sell or serve alcohol beverages for consumption on the licensed premises pursuant to section 44-3-403, 44-3-411, 44-3-412, 44-3-413, 44-3-414, 44-3-415, 44-3-416, 44-3-417, 44-3-418, 44-3-419, 44-3-420, 44-3-421, 44-3-422, 44-3-424, 44-3-426, 44-3-428, or 44-4-107 (1)(b).

This subsection (10) does not preclude a licensee described in section 44-3-423 (2) from permitting a customer to remove from the licensed premises one opened container of partially consumed vinous liquor that was purchased on the licensed premises and has been resealed, as permitted by section 44-3-423 (1).

Except as provided in subsection (11)(b) of this section, a retail licensee or an employee of a retail licensee shall not sell malt, vinous, or spirituous liquors or fermented malt beverages to a consumer for consumption off the licensed premises unless the retail licensee or employee verifies that the consumer is at least twenty-one years of age by requiring the consumer to present a valid identification, as determined by the state licensing authority by rule. The retail licensee or employee shall make a determination from the information presented whether the purchaser is at least twenty-one years of age.

It is not unlawful for a retail licensee or employee of a retail licensee to sell malt, vinous, or spirituous liquors or fermented malt beverages to a consumer who is or reasonably appears to be over fifty years of age and who failed to present an acceptable form of identification.

As used in this subsection (11), "retail licensee" means a person licensed under section 44-3-409, 44-3-410, 44-4-104 (1)(c), or 44-4-107 (1)(a).

WARNING

IT IS ILLEGAL TO SELL WHISKEY, WINE, OR BEER TO ANY PERSON UNDER TWENTY-ONE YEARS OF AGE, AND IT IS ILLEGAL FOR ANY PERSON UNDER TWENTY-ONE YEARS OF AGE TO POSSESS OR TO ATTEMPT TO PURCHASE THE SAME.
IDENTIFICATION CARDS WHICH APPEAR TO BE FRAUDULENT WHEN PRESENTED BY PURCHASERS MAY BE CONFISCATED BY THE ESTABLISHMENT AND TURNED OVER TO A LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY.
IT IS ILLEGAL IF YOU ARE TWENTY-ONE YEARS OF AGE OR OLDER FOR YOU TO PURCHASE WHISKEY, WINE, OR BEER FOR A PERSON UNDER TWENTY-ONE YEARS OF AGE.
FINES AND IMPRISONMENT MAY BE IMPOSED BY THE COURTS FOR VIOLATION OF THESE PROVISIONS.

WARNING

DO NOT LEAVE THE PREMISES OF THIS ESTABLISHMENT WITH AN ALCOHOL BEVERAGE.
IT IS ILLEGAL TO CONSUME AN ALCOHOL BEVERAGE IN A PUBLIC PLACE.
A FINE OF UP TO $250 MAY BE IMPOSED BY THE COURTS FOR A VIOLATION OF THIS PROVISION.

Source:

L. 2018:

IP(1), (1)(g), (1)(n), and (6)(e) amended, (SB 18-067), ch. 4, p. 31, § 3, effective March 1; (1)(m) amended, (HB 18-1375), ch. 274, p. 1696, § 8, effective May 29; (4)(c) amended, (SB 18-124), ch. 23, p. 277, § 1, effective August 8; entire article added with relocations, (HB 18-1025), ch. 152, p. 1049, § 2, effective October 1; (6)(n)(I) amended, (HB 18-1024), ch. 26, p. 321, § 7, effective October 1; IP(1), (1)(g), (1)(i)(I), (1)(i)(II), (6)(c), (6)(k), (6)(p)(I)(B), (6)(p)(II), (6)(p)(III), (10)(b), and (11) amended and (1)(i)(VII) added, (SB 18-243), ch. 366, p. 2205, § 11, effective January 1, 2019.

L. 2019:

IP(1)(i)(I), (1)(i)(I)(A), (1)(i)(VII), (3), IP(5), (5)(b), and (7) amended, (SB 19-011), ch. 1, p. 15, § 25, effective January 31; (1)(i)(VIII) added, (SB 19-200), ch. 307, p. 2798, § 1, effective August 2; (6)(o) amended, (HB 19-1172), ch. 136, p. 1734, § 262, effective October 1.

L. 2020:

(3) amended, (HB 20-1055), ch. 15, p. 68, § 3, effective September 14.

L. 2022:

(6)(m) amended, (HB 22-1415), ch. 426, p. 3019, § 5, effective June 7.

44-3-902. Testing for intoxication by law enforcement officers - when prohibited.

No person who is patronizing a licensed premises as defined in sections 44-3-103 (24) and 44-4-103 (3) shall be required or solicited by any law enforcement officer to submit to any mechanical test for the purpose of determining the alcohol content of the person's blood or breath while he or she is upon the licensed premises except to determine if there is a violation of section 42-4-1301 by a driver of a motor vehicle, unless the law enforcement officer is acting pursuant to a court order obtained in the manner described in subsection (2) of this section. No such test may be performed upon any licensed premises to obtain evidence of alleged intoxication, except pursuant to a court order as provided in this section or in case of a medical emergency, regardless of whether the alleged intoxication is a violation of any provision of this article 3.

An ex parte order to permit any law enforcement officer to solicit any person who is patronizing a licensed premises, as defined in sections 44-3-103 (24) and 44-4-103 (3), to submit to any mechanical test for the purpose of determining the alcohol content of the person's blood or breath while he or she is upon such licensed premises may be issued by any judge of competent jurisdiction in the state of Colorado, including a district, county, or municipal court judge, upon application of a district attorney or a law enforcement agency showing probable cause to believe that evidence will be obtained of the commission of the crime of providing any alcohol beverage to a visibly intoxicated person or minor in violation of section 44-3-901 (1)(a) or (6)(a)(I).

Each application for an ex parte order as described in subsection (2) of this section shall be made in writing upon oath or affirmation to a judge of competent jurisdiction, including a district, county, or municipal court judge, and shall state the applicant's authority to make the application. Each application shall include the following information:

The identity of the investigative or law enforcement officer making the application, and the officer authorizing the application;

A complete statement of the facts and circumstances relied upon by the applicant to justify his or her belief that an order should be issued, which shall include, but not be limited to:

A sufficient description of the licensed premises that is proposed to be the subject of the court order;

Evidence that shows probable cause to believe that there have been frequent and continuing violations of section 44-3-901 (1)(a) or (6)(a)(I) regarding the crime of providing any alcohol beverage to a visibly intoxicated person or minor; and

A complete statement as to whether or not other investigative procedures have been tried and failed, or why other investigative procedures reasonably appear to be impractical for economic or other reasons or unlikely to succeed if tried.

Upon an application being made in accordance with subsection (3) of this section, the judge may enter an ex parte order, as requested or as modified, authorizing or approving testing as described in subsection (2) of this section in a particular licensed premises located within the territorial jurisdiction of the court in which the judge is sitting, and within the jurisdiction of the district attorney or law enforcement agency making the request, if the judge determines on the basis of the facts submitted by the applicant that:

There is probable cause to believe that there have been frequent and continuing violations of section 44-3-901 (1)(a) or (6)(a)(I) regarding the crime of providing an alcohol beverage to a visibly intoxicated person or minor; and

Normal investigative procedures have been tried and failed, or reasonably appear impractical for economic or other reasons or unlikely to succeed if tried.

Any order issued pursuant to subsection (4) of this section, the application for such order, and any information or evidence submitted to the court in support of such order, shall not be disclosed to any person other than the law enforcement officer or agency that applied for the order until the order has been executed at the licensed premises to which the order applies.

Any evidence obtained through any violation of this section shall not be admissible in any court of this state or in any administrative proceeding in this state.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 18-1025), ch. 152, p. 1059, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47-902 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-3-903. Alcohol-without-liquid devices - legislative declaration - definition - unlawful acts.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that:

Alcohol-without-liquid (AWOL) devices create alcohol vapor by pouring alcohol into a diffuser capsule connected to an oxygen pipe;

AWOL devices enable individuals to inhale or snort the alcohol vapor created from certain alcohol beverages through a tube into the nose or mouth rather than drink the alcohol beverage in its liquid form through the mouth;

Alcohol vapor ingested from an AWOL device bypasses the stomach and the filtering capabilities of the liver and is absorbed through blood vessels in the nose or lungs creating a faster and more intense "high" or intoxicating effect on the brain;

The popularity of AWOL devices is increasing in the nightclub and bar businesses throughout the nation; and

AWOL devices are being marketed as a way to become intoxicated without a hangover and as a "dieter's dream" because there are no calories associated with inhaling or snorting alcohol vapor.

The general assembly, therefore, determines that:

AWOL devices will substantially increase the economic costs of alcohol abuse in Colorado;

AWOL devices are not conducive to the health, safety, and welfare of the citizens of Colorado; and

The possession, sale, purchase, and use of AWOL devices in this state should be prohibited.

For purposes of this section, "AWOL device" means a device, machine, apparatus, or appliance that mixes an alcohol beverage with pure or diluted oxygen to produce an alcohol vapor that an individual can inhale or snort. "AWOL device" does not include an inhaler, nebulizer, atomizer, or other device that is designed and intended by the manufacturer to dispense a prescribed or over-the-counter medication.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (5) of this section, it is unlawful for a person to possess, purchase, sell, offer to sell, or use an AWOL device in this state. A person who violates this section shall be punished in accordance with the provisions of section 44-3-904 (2).

In addition to the penalty imposed by this section, if a person that violates subsection (3) of this section is a licensee, the state or local licensing authority may suspend or revoke the license of the licensee in accordance with the provisions of section 44-3-601.

Subsection (3) of this section shall not apply to a hospital that operates primarily for the purpose of conducting scientific research, a state institution conducting bona fide research, a private college or university, as defined in section 23-2-102 (11), conducting bona fide research, or to a pharmaceutical company or biotechnology company conducting bona fide research and that complies with the provisions of this subsection (5).

A hospital, state institution, private college or university, pharmaceutical company, or biotechnology company that possesses an AWOL device or that intends to acquire an AWOL device, shall, by September 1, 2005, or within thirty days prior to the acquisition, whichever is later, file with the Colorado department of public health and environment or its designee a notice of possession of AWOL device or a notice of acquisition of AWOL device, as appropriate.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (HB 18-1025), ch. 152, p. 1060, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47-902.5 as it existed prior to 2018.